Utah statutes.
57-19-21.   Voidable agreements.
Any agreement to purchase an interest in a project entered into in violation
of Section 57-19-4 or 57-19-14 may, at the option of the purchaser, be voided
and the purchaser's entire consideration recovered together with interest at
the legal rate, costs, and reasonable attorney's fees.  However, no suit under
this section may be brought more than two years after:
(1)  the date the agreement is signed; or
(2)  the date the purchaser knew or reasonably should have known of the
violation.
